Missouri, session 2026, HB1998.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 160.2560 and 173.2560, to read as follows:
160.2560. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Defunding
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion in Elementary and Secondary Education Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the state department of elementary and secondary education;
(2) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" or "DEI", any educational program,
course, initiative, or curriculum designed to promote, teach, or enforce principles
related to diversity, equity, and inclusion. DEI includes, but is not limited to, training,
workshops, curriculum materials, student groups, and any other program or event
related to such subjects;
(3) "Educational institution", each public school and school district in this state;
(4) "State funding", any financial support, grants, or allocations provided by the
state of Missouri to an educational institution, including federal funds passed through
the state.
3. (1) No educational institution shall use state funding for the implementation,
teaching, or support of DEI programs or initiatives.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1998 2
(2) (a) An educational institution that uses state funding for activities related to
DEI shall return the amount of state funding used for such activities to the state
treasury.
(b) In addition to the repayment of state funding, the offending educational
institution shall lose all state funding for the fiscal year in which the violation occurs.
(c) The state shall also withhold any future state funding to the offending
educational institution until the violation is rectified to the satisfaction of the
department.
4. (1) The department shall establish procedures to monitor the use of state
funding in educational institutions and ensure compliance with this section.
(2) Any resident, taxpayer, or employee of an educational institution may file a
complaint with the department if such individual believes an educational institution has
violated this section.
(3) The department shall issue an annual report detailing the enforcement of this
section. Such report shall include the number of violations and the total amount of state
funding recovered.
173.2560. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Defunding
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion in Higher Education Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the state department of higher education and workforce
development;
(2) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" or "DEI", any educational program,
course, initiative, or curriculum designed to promote, teach, or enforce principles
related to diversity, equity, and inclusion. DEI includes, but is not limited to, training,
workshops, curriculum materials, student groups, and any other program or event
related to such subjects;
(3) "Educational institution", a public postsecondary educational institution
governed or supervised by a:
(a) Board erected under chapter 172, 174, 175, or 178;
(b) Board of trustees of a community college; or
(c) State board for any other technical school;
(4) "State funding", any financial support, grants, or allocations provided by the
state of Missouri to an educational institution, including federal funds passed through
the state.
3. (1) No educational institution shall use state funding for the implementation,
teaching, or support of DEI programs or initiatives.

HB 1998 3
(2) (a) An educational institution that uses state funding for activities related to
DEI shall return the amount of state funding used for such activities to the state
treasury.
(b) In addition to the repayment of state funding, the offending educational
institution shall lose all state funding for the fiscal year in which the violation occurs.
(c) The state shall also withhold any future state funding to the offending
educational institution until the violation is rectified to the satisfaction of the
department.
4. (1) The department shall establish procedures to monitor the use of state
funding in educational institutions and ensure compliance with this section.
(2) Any resident of the state or employee of an educational institution may file a
complaint with the department if such individual believes an educational institution has
violated this section.
(3) The department shall issue an annual report detailing the enforcement of this
section. Such report shall include the number of violations and the total amount of state
funding recovered.
✔